Tennessee statutes. Title 37 Juveniles
Part 1

Tennessee Commission on Children and Youth Act of 1988

37-3-101. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Commission on Children and Youth Act of 1988.”

Acts 1988, ch. 979, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§37-3-101 —37-3-110 (Acts 1980, ch. 865, §§ 1, 3-9, 13; 1985, ch. 478, § 34; T.C.A., §§37-7-101 —37-7-109), concerning the children's services commission, was repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 979, § 2.

For creation of cabinet council on services to children and youth, see Executive Order No. 19 (June 10, 1988).

Cross-References. Select committee on children and youth, title 3, ch. 15, part 2.

Supplement and account for juvenile court services improvement, §37-1-162.

Teenage pregnancy, title 37, ch. 3, part 5.

Termination of and transfer of staff, etc., of children's service commission, see §37-3-109.

37-3-102. Creation — Appointments — Meetings — Reimbursement.

There is created a permanent commission to be known as the commission on children and youth. The commission shall serve as an informational resource and advocacy agency for the efficient and effective planning, enhancement and coordination of state, regional and local policies, programs and services to promote and protect the health, well-being and development of all children and youth in Tennessee.

The commission shall consist of twenty-one (21) members, to be appointed by the governor on the basis of broadly based and demonstrated leadership, interest, knowledge and activities concerning the problems and needs of children and youth. At least one (1) member of the commission shall be appointed from each of the state's nine (9) development districts. Membership shall include residents of urban as well as rural areas of the state. In making each appointment to the commission, the governor shall remain cognizant of, and shall give due consideration to, any applicable federal criteria that may be imposed pursuant to the provisions of the Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention Act of 1974, compiled in 42 U.S.C. § 5601 et seq., as amended, and shall also remain cognizant of, and give due consideration to, the intent of this part that the commission shall act to promote and protect the health, well-being and development of all children and youth in Tennessee. In making appointments to the commission, the governor shall strive to ensure that at least one (1) person serving on the commission is sixty (60) years of age or older and that at least one (1) person serving on the commission is a member of a racial minority.

Each regular appointment to the commission shall be for a term of three (3) years, and every appointee shall serve until a successor has been appointed and has qualified. No member of the commission may be appointed to serve more than three (3) consecutive three-year terms. Any vacancy occurring on the commission shall be filled by appointment only for the remainder of the unexpired term. Following any member's three (3) successive absences from commission meetings, the chair may request the governor to declare a vacancy and to fill the unexpired term.

The commission shall maintain a permanent office in Nashville and shall meet at least four (4) times each year to transact business and perform its duties. The commission may meet at such other times and places as it deems necessary.

The governor shall appoint one (1) member of the commission to serve as chair for a term of three (3) years.

The commission may establish such subcommittees and ad hoc committees, and may convene such interdisciplinary advisory groups, as it may deem necessary to efficiently and effectively perform its duties and responsibilities.

Members of the commission shall receive no compensation for their services, but shall be reimbursed for travel and other expenses actually incurred in the performance of their official duties. Such reimbursement shall be paid in accordance with the provisions of the comprehensive out-of-state travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

Acts 1988, ch. 979, § 2; 1988, ch. 1013, § 12; 2015, ch. 422, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. The commission on children and youth, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2024. See §§4-29-112,4-29-245.

Acts 2020, ch. 657, § 3 provided that the commission on children and youth shall appear before the senate government operations committee no later than April 30, 2021, to update the committee on the commission's progress in addressing the findings set forth in the June 2019 performance audit report issued by the comptroller of the treasury and any other matters related to the commission's function.

For creation of the Tennessee juvenile justice commission, and the involvement of the former children's services commission personnel therein, see Executive Order No. 56 (October 26, 1983).

For creation of cabinet council on services to children and youth, see Executive Order No. 19 (June 10, 1988).

Former part 1, §§37-3-101 —37-3-110 (Acts 1980, ch. 865, §§ 1, 3-9, 13; 1985, ch. 478, § 34; T.C.A., §§37-7-101 —37-7-109), concerning the children's services commission, was repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 979, § 2.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment deleted the first sentence of (c) which read, “Initial appointments to the commission shall be as follows: seven (7) members shall each be appointed to a term of one (1) year, seven (7) members shall each be appointed to a term of two (2) years, and seven (7) members shall each be appointed to a term of three (3) years.” and substituted “Each” for “Thereafter, each” at the beginning of the second sentence of (c).

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 422, § 3. May 8, 2015.

Cross-References. Membership in child sexual abuse task force, §37-1-603.

37-3-103. Powers and duties.

The commission shall perform each of the following duties:

Make recommendations concerning establishment of priorities and needed improvements with respect to programs and services for children and youth;

On or before September 1 of each year, make recommendations for the state budget for the following fiscal year regarding services for children and youth and submit the recommendations to the governor, the finance, ways and means committee of the senate, the finance, ways and means committee of the house of representatives, the legislative office of budget analysis, and the affected state departments;

Implement the provisions of the Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention Act of 1974, compiled in 42 U.S.C. § 5601 et seq., and distribute, consistent with the purpose of the commission as set forth by § 37-3-102(a), such funds as the general assembly shall direct;

Advocate and coordinate the efficient and effective development and enhancement of state, local and regional programs and services for children and youth;

Publish annually, on or before December 31, a comprehensive report on the status of children and youth in Tennessee; and distribute the report to the governor, to each member of the general assembly and to each of the state's depository libraries; and

Promulgate, in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, such rules as may be necessary to perform the duties prescribed by this part.

If a new, separate or reorganized department, office or agency is established to administer the duties of youth services in the department of correction, the duties in this subsection (a) and the duties and authority provided by §§ 37-1-161 and 37-1-162, and any funds allocated to the commission on children and youth for distribution, may be transferred by executive order of the governor to such new, separate or reorganized entity.

To the extent that adequate resources are available, the commission is authorized to perform any one (1) or more of the following activities:

Identify and analyze specific problems concerning programs and services for children and youth;

[Deleted by 2015 amendment]

Review licensing or certification standards and program policies, promulgated by entities of state government, that affect children and youth; and make recommendations concerning such standards and policies to the governor, to the entity promulgating any such standard or policy and to each member of the general assembly; and

Monitor foster care review boards; report on the impact of foster care review on children and youth in foster care; and make recommendations for improvement of the state's foster care system to the governor and each member of the general assembly.

Acts 1988, ch. 979, § 2; 1999, ch. 230, § 3; 2010, ch. 1030, § 12; 2015, ch. 259, § 3; 2016, ch. 797, § 4.

Code Commission Notes.

Article II, § 24 of the Constitution of Tennessee provides, in part, that: “Any law requiring the expenditure of state funds shall be null and void unless, during the session in which the act receives final passage, and appropriation is made for the estimated first year's funding.”

The Tennessee code commission has been advised by the commissioner of finance and administration that the necessary first year's funding was not appropriated during the 1991 regular session for the public act that would have amended this section.

The code commission was directed by Acts 1991, ch. 509, § 54 to not codify acts that did not receive first year's funding. Accordingly, Acts 1991, ch. 246, § 2, which would have amended this section, has not been codified. If chapter 246, § 2 had been codified, the amendment to this section by that act would have added a new subdivision in (a)(1), which would have read as follows: “Develop and implement a statewide program of training and other technical support to periodically assist advisory review boards on foster care, created pursuant to §37-2-406, in the efficient and effective performance of duties and responsibilities assigned to such boards.”

Compiler's Notes. For creation of advisory group to the commission on children and youth, see Executive Order No. 29 (September 26, 1989).

Former part 1, §§37-3-101 —37-3-110 (Acts 1980, ch. 865, §§ 1, 3-9, 13; 1985, ch. 478, § 34; T.C.A., §§37-7-101 —37-7-109), concerning the children's services commission, was repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 979, § 2.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment deleted (b)(2), which read, “Prepare and distribute impact statements analyzing the potential effect of proposals under consideration by the general assembly that relate to the health, well being and development of children and youth;”.

The 2016 amendment rewrote (a)(1)(B) which read: “(B) Review and analyze the proposed budget, as contained within the general appropriations act, for each entity of state government that utilizes state or federal funds to administer or provide programs and services for children and youth; prepare and distribute an impact statement for the proposed budget of each such entity; and make recommendations to the governor, the finance, ways and means committee of the senate, the finance, ways and means committee of the house of representatives and the legislative office of budget analysis;”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 259, § 4. April 24, 2015.

Acts 2016, ch. 797, § 19. April 14, 2016.

Cross-References. Mentally ill or intellectually disabled minors in youth development center, §33-3-401.

Reporting requirement satisfied by notice to general assembly members of publication of report, §3-1-114.

37-3-104. Executive director.

The commission shall be administered by an executive director who is appointed by and serves at the pleasure of the members of the commission. The executive director shall be a full-time employee of the commission and shall be responsible for the administration of commission policies, rules, and guidelines and the proper management and operation of the commission's programs and activities. The executive director shall be an individual who is professionally trained in one (1) or more fields involving services to children and youth, who has a working knowledge of programs for children and youth, and who has previous employment experience in managing and delivering services to children and youth.

Acts 1988, ch. 979, § 2; 2012, ch. 986, § 17; 2015, ch. 422, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§37-3-101 —37-3-110 (Acts 1980, ch. 865, §§ 1, 3-9, 13; 1985, ch. 478, § 34; T.C.A., §§37-7-101 —37-7-109), concerning the children's services commission, was repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 979, § 2.

Acts 2012, ch. 986, § 48 provided that all rules, regulations, orders, and decisions heretofore issued or promulgated by any of the boards or commissions, which the act terminates or merges into another board or commission, shall remain in full force and effect. In the case of the boards or commissions that are merged with another board or commission by the act, all final rules, regulations, orders, and decisions together with any matters that are pending on October 1, 2012, shall hereafter be administered, enforced, modified, or rescinded in accordance with the law applicable to the continuing board or commission.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment rewrote the current first sentence by combining and revising the former first and second sentences which read, “The commission shall be administered by an executive director. The governor shall appoint the executive director, who shall serve at the pleasure of the governor.” and deleted the last sentence which read, “The executive director's compensation shall be fixed by the governor.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 422, § 3. May 8, 2015.

37-3-105. Personnel — Travel reimbursement.

The executive director, subject to the approval of the commission and the commissioner of finance and administration, shall employ other personnel as may be necessary for the performance of the duties as prescribed by this part.

All reimbursement for travel of commission staff shall be in accordance with the provisions of the comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

Acts 1988, ch. 979, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§37-3-101 —37-3-110 (Acts 1980, ch. 865, §§ 1, 3-9, 13; 1985, ch. 478, § 34; T.C.A., §§37-7-101 —37-7-109), concerning the children's services commission, was repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 979, § 2.

37-3-106. Regional councils.

There shall be a regional council on children and youth organized by the commission in each of the nine (9) development districts of the state. The regional councils shall perform each of the following duties:

Provide for mutual exchange of information and networking among service providers, advocates and elected officials;

Educate council members, officials, others involved in services for children and youth, and the general public concerning the needs and problems of children and youth in the region and the state;

Coordinate regional and local efforts between public and private service providers to enhance services for children and youth;

Advocate for legislation, policies and programs at the local and regional level to promote and protect the health, well being and development of children and youth;

Collect, compile and distribute data; and

Make recommendations on the needs and problems of children and youth.

The regional councils on children and youth shall be the ongoing communication links between the commission and the various regional and local areas of the state. The councils shall perform information-gathering and problem solving tasks concerning services for children and youth. Each council shall report to the commission, at least annually, its recommendations for improvements in services for children and youth.

The commission shall establish guidelines for the composition and operation of the regional councils. The commission shall provide at least one (1) locally based staff person for each regional council to assist the council in performing the duties assigned by this part. Such staff person shall coordinate, advise and consult with the council, shall provide technical assistance to the council and community organizations serving children and youth, and shall act as liaison to the commission.

Acts 1988, ch. 979, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§37-3-101 —37-3-110 (Acts 1980, ch. 865, §§ 1, 3-9, 13; 1985, ch. 478, § 34; T.C.A., §§37-7-101 —37-7-109), concerning the children's services commission, was repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 979, § 2.

37-3-107. References to predecessors — Prior contracts, rules, etc.

References to the commission on children and youth, the office of child development, the children's services commission, and the juvenile justice commission appearing elsewhere in Tennessee Code Annotated are deemed to be references to the commission on children and youth. All contracts and leases entered into by the children's services commission and by the juvenile justice commission shall continue in full force and effect as to all essential provisions in accordance with the terms and conditions of the contract in existence on July 1, 1988, unless and until such contracts or leases expire or are duly amended or modified by the parties thereto. All rules, orders, and decisions promulgated or issued by the children's services commission or the juvenile justice commission prior to, and in effect on July 1, 1988, shall remain in force and effect and shall be administered and enforced by the commission on children and youth until duly amended, repealed, expired, modified or superseded.

Acts 1988, ch. 979, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§37-3-101 —37-3-110 (Acts 1980, ch. 865, §§ 1, 3-9, 13; 1985, ch. 478, § 34; T.C.A., §§37-7-101 —37-7-109), concerning the children's services commission, was repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 979, § 2.

37-3-108. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §37-3-108 (Acts 1988, ch. 874, §§ 1, 3, 4; 1988, ch. 979, § 2; 1988, ch. 1005, § 6; 1988, ch. 1011, § 1; 1988, ch. 1012, § 1; 1988, ch. 1021, § 1; 1989, ch. 278, § 43; 1996, ch. 1079, § 183), concerning the interdepartmental coordination council, was repealed by Acts 1999, ch. 230, § 4, effective July 1, 1999.

Former part 1, §§37-3-101 —37-3-110 (Acts 1980, ch. 865, §§ 1, 3-9, 13; 1985, ch. 478, § 34; T.C.A., §§37-7-101 —37-7-109), concerning the children's services commission, was repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 979, § 2.

37-3-109. Transfer of functions.

The provisions of § 4-29-114 shall not apply to this part.

All staff, staff positions, offices, equipment, supplies, property, funds and other resources of the children's services commission and the juvenile justice commission shall be transferred to the commission on children and youth.

The commission on children and youth shall be subject to the provisions of § 4-29-118(a).

Acts 1988, ch. 979, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§37-3-101 —37-3-110 (Acts 1980, ch. 865, §§ 1, 3-9, 13; 1985, ch. 478, § 34; T.C.A., §§37-7-101 —37-7-109), concerning the children's services commission, was repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 979, § 2.

37-3-110. Definitions for §§ 37-3-110 — 37-3-115.

As used in this section and in §§37-3-111 —37-3-115, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Child-centered” means a system in which the needs of the child are at its core and that integrates services and programs offered by various departments of state government, units of local government and public and private agencies to support and serve the child;

“Commission” means the commission on children and youth;

“Council” means the council on children's mental health care;

“Culturally competent” means a system that has the ability to deliver and ensure access to services in a manner that effectively responds to the values and practices present in the various cultures of children;

“Demonstration sites” means certain geographic areas throughout the state where children's mental health care is in keeping with the principles set out in § 37-3-112(b);

“Family” means:

The members of a household living, on a full-time or a part-time basis, in one (1) house, condominium, apartment or other dwelling;

People related by blood or ancestry, marriage, or adoption;

Any person who is held out to the public as being a family member of a child;

Foster parents and foster children;

Stepparents and stepchildren; and

Any other group that the council determines by policy or rule to constitute a family for purposes of this part;

“Family-driven” means a system in which the needs of the family are at its core and that integrates services and programs offered by various departments of state government, units of local government and public and private agencies to support and serve the family;

“Linguistically competent” means a system that has the ability to deliver and ensure access to services in a manner that effectively responds to the languages present in the various cultures of children;

“Mental health care” means all services and programs offered by various departments of state government, units of local government and public and private agencies that support and serve the mental health needs of children and their families; and

“Mental health needs” means any significant behavioral problem or emotional disorder, whether the problem or disorder is biologically-based or due to environmental factors, including, but not limited to, any psychiatric disorder, alcohol or substance abuse, depression or suicide, hyperactivity or attention-deficit disorder.

Acts 2008, ch. 1062, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act regarding to the mental health needs of Tennessee's children and youth, please refer to Acts 2008, ch. 1062.

Former part 1, §§37-3-101 —37-3-110 (Acts 1980, ch. 865, §§ 1, 3-9, 13; 1985, ch. 478, § 34; T.C.A., §§37-7-101 —37-7-109), concerning the children's services commission, was repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 979, § 2.

37-3-111. Council on children's mental health care — Members — Meetings.

There shall be a council on children's mental health care organized by the commission that shall design a plan for a statewide system of mental health care for children.

The council shall be co-chaired by the executive director of the commission on children and youth and the commissioner of mental health and substances abuse services, or either of their designees.

Members of the council shall include, but not be limited to:

The commissioners of children's services, finance and administration, health, human services, education, mental health and substance abuse services, and intellectual and developmental disabilities, or their designees;

The director of the bureau of TennCare or the director's designee;

Two (2) persons from the department of mental health and substance abuse services who are selected by the commissioner of mental health and substance abuse services; provided, that one (1) person is familiar with children and youth services and one (1) person is familiar with alcohol and drug abuse services;

The chair of the commission on children and youth or the chair's designee;

One (1) member of the governor's personal staff appointed by the governor;

One (1) legislator appointed by the speaker of the senate and one (1) legislator appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives; and

One (1) representative from the comptroller of the treasury.

Other members of the council shall be selected by the co-chairs and shall include:

Four (4) parents of children who have received mental health services from a state agency or other provider and are chosen from nominations received from representatives of statewide organizations that advocate for or serve children's mental health needs, that provide for representation from each of the three (3) grand divisions of the state and from both urban and rural areas;

Two (2) persons who are under twenty-four (24) years of age and who are receiving or have received mental health services from a state agency or other provider and are chosen from nominations received from representatives of statewide organizations that advocate for or serve children's mental health needs;

Three (3) representatives of the community services agencies, or their successor organizations, as established pursuant to § 37-5-304;

Two (2) representatives of a statewide organization that advocates for children's mental health needs;

Two (2) representatives of providers of children's mental health services; and

Three (3) judges chosen by the Tennessee council of juvenile and family court judges that provide for representation from each of the three (3) grand divisions of the state and both urban and rural areas.

Following three (3) consecutive absences, the co-chairs may declare a vacancy and request that a new member be appointed pursuant to this section who meets the criteria of the replaced member.

The members of the council shall receive no salary. Only members of the council selected pursuant to subdivisions (d)(1) and (2) shall be reimbursed necessary travel and per diem expenses as prescribed in the comprehensive travel regulations by the commissioner of finance and administration for employees of this state; provided, that all other members who are employed by the state or who are holding elected office will be compensated and reimbursed in keeping with the performance of their official roles or capacities.

As well as serving as a voting member on the council, the executive director of the commission or the executive director's designee shall also serve as the chief administrative officer of the council. The executive director shall have the authority to conduct ordinary and necessary business in the name of the council in accordance with this section or as determined by the council.

The council shall meet as necessary to transact business; provided, that meetings shall be held at least quarterly and the meetings shall be open to organizations, agencies, and individuals who work in the area of children's mental health, including, but not limited to, mental health services, educational services, substance abuse services, recreational services, social services, health services, vocational services, operational services and nontraditional services, to seek opportunities to collaborate and improve the statewide system of children's mental health care. The council's quarterly meetings shall pay particular attention to interagency collaboration, funding, accountability, information management, and service array.

All meetings held by the council are subject to the open meeting provisions of title 8, chapter 44.

Acts 2008, ch. 1062, § 1; 2010, ch. 1100, §§ 55–57; 2012, ch. 575, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. The council on children's mental health care, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2022. See §§4-29-104,4-29-243.

For the Preamble to the act regarding to the mental health needs of Tennessee's children and youth, please refer to Acts 2008, ch. 1062.

Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health, the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Former part 1, §§37-3-101 —37-3-110 (Acts 1980, ch. 865, §§ 1, 3-9, 13; 1985, ch. 478, § 34; T.C.A., §§37-7-101 —37-7-109), concerning the children's services commission, was repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 979, § 2.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

37-3-112. Plan for a statewide system of care — Principles of care — Resource map and cost analysis.

The council shall develop a plan for a statewide system of care where children's mental health care is child-centered, family-driven, and culturally and linguistically competent and that provides a coordinated system of care for children's mental health needs in this state.

The plan developed pursuant to subsection (a) shall provide for a service delivery system operated in a manner that provides the following principles of care:

Children with mental health needs should have access to a comprehensive array of services that address the child's physical, emotional, social and educational needs;

Children with mental health needs should receive individualized services in accordance with the unique needs and potentials of each child and guided by an individualized service plan;

Children with mental health needs should receive services within the least restrictive, most normative environment that is therapeutically appropriate;

The families of children with mental health needs should be full participants in all aspects of the planning and delivery of services;

Children with mental health needs should receive services that are integrated, with linkages between child-serving agencies and programs and mechanisms for planning, developing and coordinating the services;

Children with mental health needs should be provided with case management or similar mechanisms to ensure that multiple services are delivered in a coordinated, integrated and therapeutic manner and that each child can move through the system of services in accordance with their changing needs;

Early identification and intervention for children with mental health needs should be promoted by the system of care in order to enhance the likelihood of positive outcomes;

Children with mental health needs whose needs continue beyond adolescence should be ensured smooth transitions to the adult service system as each child reaches adulthood;

The rights of children with mental health needs should be protected; and

Children with mental health needs have access to services without regard to race, religion, national origin, sex, physical disability or other characteristics. Services should be sensitive and responsive to cultural differences and special needs.

The plan shall include a core set of services and supports that appropriately and effectively addresses the mental health needs of children and families.

The council, to guide and support the plan, shall also develop a financial resource map and cost analysis of all federal and state funded programs that support and serve children's mental health needs in this state. The council shall assure the financial resource map and cost analysis are updated annually so as to maintain a current cost analysis of the funds used to support children's mental health care needs in the state from conception through the age of majority or so long as the child receives services provided by these funding streams. The resource map and cost analysis shall include, but not be limited to:

An inventory of all federal and state funding sources that support children's mental health needs in this state;

A description of the manner in which the funds are being used within the agencies or organizations, the performance measures in place to assess the use of the funding and the intended outcomes of the programs and services;

Government mandates for the use of such funds, if any; and

An inventory of the funds for which the state may be eligible, but is currently not receiving or using, and the reasons why the funds are not being used.

Acts 2008, ch. 1062, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act regarding to the mental health needs of Tennessee's children and youth, please refer to Acts 2008, ch. 1062.

Former part 1, §§37-3-101 —37-3-110 (Acts 1980, ch. 865, §§ 1, 3-9, 13; 1985, ch. 478, § 34; T.C.A., §§37-7-101 —37-7-109), concerning the children's services commission, was repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 979, § 2.

Acts 2008, ch. 1197, § 1 purported to enact a new §37-3-112; however, since Acts 2008, ch. 1062, § 1 added §37-3-112, the section enacted by ch. 1197 was added as §37-3-116.

Cross-References. Mental health services for children, title 33, ch. 8.

Special education, title 49, ch. 10.

37-3-113. Duties of council.

In addition to other duties imposed by law, the council shall also perform the following duties:

Facilitate interagency coordination and collaboration in the planning, funding, delivery and evaluation of a statewide system of mental health care for children;

Define accountability standards among all agencies and organizations that provide services and support relative to the mental health needs of children and their families;

Encourage the matching of federal funds required by federal grants for children's mental health initiatives;

Serve as an advocate within government and in the community for children's mental health care in this state;

Stimulate more effective use of existing resources and services for children, and develop programs, opportunities and services that are not otherwise provided for children, with the aim of developing a comprehensive and coordinated system for the delivery of mental health services to children in the state;

Assist the department of mental health and substance abuse services in the development of interagency agreements on services and supports for children; and

Determine, in consultation with appropriate research experts, which programs that are currently being used to serve or support children's mental health needs in the state are evidence-based, as defined by § 37-5-121, research-based, as defined by § 37-5-121 and theory-based, as defined by § 37-5-121. The council shall provide such findings in its annual report submitted in accordance with § 37-1-115, including an explanation of the support for those findings.

Acts 2008, ch. 1062, § 1; 2010, ch. 1100, § 58; 2012, ch. 575, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act regarding to the mental health needs of Tennessee's children and youth, please refer to Acts 2008, ch. 1062.

Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health, the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Former part 1, §§37-3-101 —37-3-110 (Acts 1980, ch. 865, §§ 1, 3-9, 13; 1985, ch. 478, § 34; T.C.A., §§37-7-101 —37-7-109), concerning the children's services commission, was repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 979, § 2.

Cross References: Mental health services for children, title 33, ch. 8.

37-3-114. Additional duties of council.

The council may perform each of the following duties:

Promulgate bylaws to provide for the election of council officers, establishment of committees, meetings, and other matters relating to council functions;

Request and receive the cooperation of other state departments and agencies in carrying out the policies and objectives of this part;

Enter into such contracts and make such grants within the limits of appropriated funds as are necessary or appropriate under this section, and in a manner consistent with state or federal law;

Advise the governor and the heads of state departments and agencies regarding policies, programs, services, allocation of funds and children's mental health needs in this state and make recommendations for legislative action to the governor and to the general assembly;

Hold hearings, conduct research and other appropriate activities to determine the mental health needs of children in the state, including particularly, but not limited to, their needs for health and social services, and to determine the existing services and facilities, private and public, available to meet those needs; and

Review data, reports and outcomes of local, state and national system of care implementation, as well as other relevant data or research.

Acts 2008, ch. 1062, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act regarding to the mental health needs of Tennessee's children and youth, please refer to Acts 2008, ch. 1062.

Former part 1, §§37-3-101 —37-3-110 (Acts 1980, ch. 865, §§ 1, 3-9, 13; 1985, ch. 478, § 34; T.C.A., §§37-7-101 —37-7-109), concerning the children's services commission, was repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 979, § 2.

37-3-115. Report, plan and budget.

No later than February 1, 2009, the council shall submit a report regarding the status of the development of a plan for a statewide system of care for children's mental health. The report shall include, but not be limited to:

The timeline for development of the overall plan;

Barriers to implementation of such a plan, if any;

A list of all programs currently in place to serve and support children's mental health needs and whether those programs are evidence-based, research-based or theory-based;

The status of interagency cooperation relative to a system of children's mental health care throughout the state; and

A financial resource map of all current federal and state funded programs that support or serve children with mental health needs in the state.

The report shall also include cost analysis information produced in accordance with § 37-3-112(d) and shall provide recommendations for improving efficiency in the use of existing state and federal funds by increasing coordination of children's mental health care with other child-focused service delivery systems.

No later than July 1, 2010, the council shall submit a plan prepared in accordance with § 37-3-112 and a budget for implementing the plan. The plan shall provide for demonstration sites in at least three (3) areas of the state, with at least one (1) area to be in each grand division. If the plan submitted by July 1, 2010, is approved and funded by the legislature no later than July 1, 2012, the council shall submit a plan and budget for extending the demonstration sites to a total of no less than ten (10) areas of the state selected by the council. If the plan submitted by July 1, 2012, is approved and funded by the legislature, no later than July 1, 2013, the council shall submit a plan that will accomplish implementation of the system of children's mental health care statewide. The council shall create and submit with each plan current financial resource maps and cost analysis, and the information shall be required to accompany any recommendations the council makes regarding the continued development of a statewide system of children's mental health care.

The plan, budget and report required by subsections (a) and (b) shall be submitted to the governor, the judiciary, education, and health and welfare committees of the senate and the judiciary, education, and health committees of the house of representatives.

Acts 2008, ch. 1062, § 1; 2011, ch. 410, § 3(k); 2013, ch. 236, § 79; 2019, ch. 345, § 40.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act regarding to the mental health needs of Tennessee's children and youth, please refer to Acts 2008, ch. 1062.

Former part 1, §§37-3-101 —37-3-110 (Acts 1980, ch. 865, §§ 1, 3-9, 13; 1985, ch. 478, § 34; T.C.A., §§37-7-101 —37-7-109), concerning the children's services commission, was repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 979, § 2.

For the Preamble to the act concerning the prohibition against establishment of a special committee if there is a standing committee on the same subject, please refer to Acts 2011, ch. 410.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “and the judiciary, education, and health committees of the house of representatives” for “and the civil justice, education and health committees of the house of representatives” in (c).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 345, § 148. May 10, 2019.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.